src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv21_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: gjógv
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: gjógv
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: gjógv
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: gjáar
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: gjáir
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: gjáum
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: gjáa
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: gjógvin
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: gjónna
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: gjónni
    gjógv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: gjáarinnar
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: gjáirnar
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: gjáunum
    gjógv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: gjáanna
